Washington statutes.
RCW 10.85.050

Payment of rewards.

Whenever any reward has been offered by any county legislative authority, board of commissioners of a port district, or city or town governing body in the state under RCW 10.85.030, the person or persons providing the information shall be entitled to the reward, and the county legislative authority, board of commissioners of a port district, or city or town governing body which has offered the reward is authorized to draw a warrant or warrants out of any money in the county, port district, or city or town treasury, as appropriate, not otherwise appropriated.

[ 1986 c 185 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 53 s 3; 1886 p 124 s 2; RRS s 2250.]